Maryland, session 2026, HB0957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
– 1 –

Ch. 34 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4–148.
(A) EACH COUNTY BOARD LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(1) DESIGNATE A LOCAL POINT OF CONTACT FOR ALL
CYBERSECURITY–RELATED COMMUNICATIONS; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER OF:
(I) THE DESIGNATION; AND
(II) ANY SUBSEQUENT UPDATE TO THE DESIGNATION.
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN 2027, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) COMPLY WITH THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY;
AND
(II) CONDUCT A CYBERSECURITY MATURITY ASSESSMENT
EVERY 2 YEARS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, AND EACH JUNE 30 EVERY 2
YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL CERTIFY TO THE OFFICE
OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY COMPLIANCE WITH THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
5–212.
(a) The target per pupil foundation amount includes costs associated with
implementing the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future including:
(1) Increasing salaries;
(2) Additional teachers to provide professional learning and collaborative
time for teachers;
(3) Career counseling;
(4) Behavioral health;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 34
(5) Instructional opportunities for students who are college and career
ready and those who are not;
(6) Maintenance and operation of schools;
(7) Supplies and materials for teachers; and
(8) Educational technology including digital devices, broadband
connectivity, [and] information technology staff, AND CYBERSECURITY.
(b) Schools may use funds provided under this section to provide the programs
required under COMAR 13A.04.16.01.
(c) (1) [County boards of education and schools shall prioritize the purchase
of digital devices for using funds under subsection (a)(8) of this section.
(2)] Additional funds provided in the target per pupil foundation amount for
educational technology are intended to supplement and not supplant existing funding
provided for educational technology.
[(3)] (2) (i) On or before [November 15 each year] AUGUST 15, 2026,
AND EACH AUGUST 15 THEREAFTER, each county board shall submit a report to the
Department detailing, for the previous fiscal year:
1. The amount spent by the local school system on technology
disaggregated by digital devices, connectivity, and information technology staff; [and]
2. The percentage of students, teachers, and staff with
digital devices and adequate connectivity in their homes in accordance with the Federal
Communications Commission standards for broadband; AND
3. CYBERSECURITY EXPENDITURES RELATED TO THE
STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
(ii) On or before December 15 each year, the Department shall
submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, a compilation of the reports submitted to the Department under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph.
(iii) On or before September 1, 2021, the Department shall establish
uniform reporting requirements, including definitions to ensure that consistent and
comparable reports are submitted under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
– 3 –

Ch. 34 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Cloud computing” means a service that enables on–demand self–service
network access to a shared pool of configurable computer resources, including data storage,
analytics, commerce, streaming, e–mail, document sharing, and document editing.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Information Technology.
(d) (1) “Oversight of implementation” means management of the process to
implement a new technology, system, or product into practice and use by a unit.
(2) “Oversight of implementation” includes:
(i) planning and preparation to implement the product or practice;
and
(ii) ongoing monitoring and support of the implementation team to
ensure successful execution and that the project goals are met.
(3) “Oversight of implementation” does not include:
(i) responsibility for day–to–day management of any individual
projects or products; or
(ii) responsibility for implementing individual–level process
requirements for a project or product.
(e) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Information Technology.
(F) “STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS” MEANS THE STATE
MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
[(f)] (G) “Telecommunication” means the transmission of information, images,
pictures, voice, or data by radio, video, or other electronic or impulse means.
[(g)] (H) “Unit of State government” means an agency or unit of the Executive
Branch of State government.
3.5–2A–02.
There is an Office of Security Management within the Department.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 34
3.5–2A–04.
(b) The Office shall:
(1) establish standards to categorize all information collected or
maintained by or on behalf of each unit of State government;
(2) establish standards to categorize all information systems maintained
by or on behalf of each unit of State government;
(3) develop guidelines governing the types of information and information
systems to be included in each category;
(4) establish security requirements for information and information
systems in each category;
(5) assess the categorization of information and information systems and
the associated implementation of the security requirements established under item (4) of
this subsection;
(6) if the State Chief Information Security Officer determines that there
are security vulnerabilities or deficiencies in any information systems, determine and direct
or take actions necessary to correct or remediate the vulnerabilities or deficiencies, which
may include requiring the information system to be disconnected;
(7) if the State Chief Information Security Officer determines that there is
a cybersecurity threat caused by, affecting, or potentially affecting an entity connected to
the network established under § 3.5–404 of this title that introduces or may introduce a
serious risk to entities connected to the network or to the State, take or direct actions
required to mitigate the threat;
(8) manage security awareness training for all appropriate employees of
units of State government;
(9) assist in the development of data management, data governance, and
data specification standards to promote standardization and reduce risk;
(10) assist in the development of a digital identity standard and
specification applicable to all parties communicating, interacting, or conducting business
with or on behalf of a unit of State government;
(11) develop and maintain information technology security policy,
standards, and guidance documents, consistent with best practices developed by the
National Institute of Standards and Technology;
– 5 –

Ch. 34 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(12) to the extent practicable, seek, identify, and inform relevant
stakeholders of any available financial assistance provided by the federal government or
non–State entities to support the work of the Office;
(13) provide technical assistance to localities in mitigating and recovering
from cybersecurity incidents;
(14) ANNUALLY REVIEW AND, IF NECESSARY, UPDATE THE STATE
MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS;
[(14)] (15) provide technical services, advice, and guidance to units of local
government to improve cybersecurity preparedness, prevention, response, and recovery
practices; and
[(15)] (16) support local governments in developing a vulnerability
assessment and cyber assessment, including providing local governments with the
resources and information on best practices to complete the assessments.
3.5–406.
(a) This section does not apply to municipal governments.
(b) In a manner and frequency established in regulations adopted by the
Department, each county government, local school system, and local health department
shall:
(1) in consultation with the local emergency manager, create or update a
cybersecurity preparedness and response plan; and
(2) complete a cybersecurity preparedness assessment.
(c) The assessment required under paragraph (b)(2) of this section may, in
accordance with the preference of each county government, be performed by the
Department or by a vendor authorized by the Department.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT’S INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICERS ON
REQUEST, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUPPORT ADVISE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS
WITH ON:
(1) (I) COMPLIANCE WITH THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS;
(2) (II) CONDUCTING CYBERSECURITY MATURITY ASSESSMENTS
EVERY 2 YEARS; AND
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 34
(3) (III) REMEDIATION EFFORTS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE SUCCESSFUL
PERFORMANCE OF OR DAY–TO–DAY MANAGEMENT OF THE DUTIES OF A LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(d)] (E) (1) Each local government shall report a cybersecurity incident,
including an attack on a State system being used by the local government, to the
appropriate local emergency manager and the State Security Operations Center in the
Department in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) For the reporting of cybersecurity incidents to local emergency
managers under [subparagraph (i) of this paragraph] PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, the State Chief Information Security Officer shall determine:
(i) the criteria for determining when an incident must be reported;
(ii) the manner in which to report; and
(iii) the time period within which a report must be made.
(3) The State Security Operations Center shall immediately notify the
appropriate agencies of a cybersecurity incident reported under this subsection through the
State Security Operations Center.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, for the 2026–2027 school
year, the Department of Information Technology shall focus on Standard 6.2 Protect (PR)
Controls of the State minimum cybersecurity standards.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 7 –